Hawaii statutes.
[§486H-17] Restricting supply of petroleum
products. The attorney general shall immediately investigate any shortage
or condition affecting the supply of any petroleum products or other matters
relating to the requirements of this chapter and shall institute all
appropriate criminal and civil actions and pursue all legal and equitable
remedies that may be available to the State. The attorney general shall submit
a report to the legislature regarding any shortage or condition affecting the
supply of petroleum products. [L 2004, c 242, §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next